Hawaii statutes.
§414-52 Reserved name. (a) A person
may reserve the exclusive use of a domestic or foreign corporate name including
a fictitious name for a foreign corporation whose corporate name is not
available, by delivering an application to the department director for filing.
The application shall set forth the name and address of the applicant and the
name proposed to be reserved. If the department director finds that the
corporate name applied for is available, the department director shall reserve
the name for the applicant's exclusive use for a one hundred twenty-day period.

(b) The owner of a reserved corporate name may
transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the department
director a signed notice of the transfer that states the name and address of
the transferee. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §14]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next